District of Columbia statutes.
15-303

Alias writs.

If a writ of execution is issued and returned unsatisfied, in whole or in part, within the period of three years provided by section 15-302 , an alias writ may be issued during the life of the judgment.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 525, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 15-301.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-303.
1973 Ed., § 15-303.